Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STORM SEWER; MINNEAPOLIS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $25,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Minneapolis to install approximately 2,100 feet of new storm sewer under 13th Avenue Northeast, from 2nd Street Northeast to a new outfall at the Mississippi River. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $25,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end